Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2140.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1331. Limitation on water and wastewater rate increases.(a) Limitation on residential rate increases.--(1) The commission may not approve a rate increase for a residential customer of a water public utility or wastewater public utility under section 1307 (relating to sliding scale of rates; adjustments), 1308 (relating to voluntary changes in rates) or 1330 (relating to alternative ratemaking for utilities) or a settlement agreement in a rate proceeding if the percent increase in the rates charged to residential customers exceeds the percent increase in the Consumer Price 123456789101112131415161718 Index, calculated using available data for the most recent 12-month period for the northeast region immediately preceding the filing date of the proposed rate change.(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply only to the rates charged to residential customers.(b) Essential water and wastewater services.--In reviewing a rate increase affecting residential customers of a water public utility or wastewater public utility, the commission shall prioritize affordability of water and wastewater service as an essential service over recovery of capital costs that are not necessary for the immediate maintenance of health and safety. The commission shall reject a rate increase that fails to meet the standard specified under this subsection.(c) Postrecovery rates.--(1) A rate increase or charge approved to recover costs of an infrastructure upgrade or construction project may not be collected after the public utility completes cost recovery for the infrastructure upgrade or construction project.(2) After the public utility completes cost recovery under paragraph (1), the public utility shall file a tariff that removes the costs incurred for the completed infrastructure upgrade or construction project from the rates charged.(3) If the public utility fails to file a tariff under paragraph (2), the commission shall proceed under section 1309 (relating to rates fixed on complaint; investigation of costs of production) to review the existing rate.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20260HB2140PN2765 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Consumer Price Index." The Consumer Price Index published by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics."Northeast region." The northeast region used by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for publication of the Consumer Price Index.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2140PN2765 - 3 - 1234567